incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="kriz/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zaslon__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="roj__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kos/ec__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vejitev__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/železo__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>železa</l>
          <r>železo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>železom</l>
          <r>železo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>železo</l>
          <r>železo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Železo</l>
          <r>železo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>železu</l>
          <r>železo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="monopol__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vez__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="uspe/šnost__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šnosti</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Šnosti</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šnosti</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šnosti</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šnosti</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šnost</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šnost</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šnost</l>
          <r>šnost<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bilanc/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ah</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vrnit/ev__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ve</l>
          <r>ev<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="rekvizit"><i>rekvizit</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="faraon"><i>faraon</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pokrov"><i>pokrov</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mučenik"><i>mučenik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nevrolog"><i>nevrolog</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pigment"><i>pigment</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="nakladalnik"><i>nakladalnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dežnik"><i>dežnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oblat"><i>oblat</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="diabetik"><i>diabetik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="destilat"><i>destilat</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="načrtovalec"><i>načrtoval</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zaslon"><i>zaslon</i><par n="zaslon__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prestopnik"><i>prestopnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stenj"><i>stenj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dobitnik"><i>dobitnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="napajalnik"><i>napajalnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kadilec"><i>kadil</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sinonim"><i>sinonim</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mislec"><i>mislec</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="parazit"><i>parazit</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="urednik"><i>urednik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="roj"><i>roj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vejitev"><i>vejitev</i><par n="vejitev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pretres"><i>pretres</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bralec"><i>bral</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kriza"><i>kriz</i><par n="kriz/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vez"><i>vez</i><par n="vez__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="odmev"><i>odmev</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="namestnik"><i>namestnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="železo"><i></i><par n="/železo__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kirurg"><i>kirurg</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="favorit"><i>favorit</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="monopol"><i>monopol</i><par n="monopol__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="svečenik"><i>svečenik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="založnik"><i>založnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klin"><i>klin</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="klik"><i>klik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gradbenik"><i>gradbenik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="razmik"><i>razmik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pretepač"><i>pretepač</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="izpuščaj"><i>izpuščaj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="fenol"><i>fenol</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zaboj"><i>zaboj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="bilanca"><i>bilanc</i><par n="bilanc/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="prapor"><i>prapor</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="varčevalec"><i>varčeval</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="družbenik"><i>družbenik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mladenič"><i>mladenič</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="izseljenec"><i>izseljen</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="avtomat"><i>avtomat</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="reagent"><i>reagent</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="korobač"><i>korobač</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kosec"><i>kos</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vrnitev"><i>vrnit</i><par n="vrnit/ev__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="valj"><i>valj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gomolj"><i>gomolj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tabor"><i>tabor</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="naval"><i>naval</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="cenzus"><i>cenzus</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="dialekt"><i>dialekt</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="posrednik"><i>posrednik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="polet"><i>polet</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="koren"><i>koren</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="referat"><i>referat</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="koncentrat"><i>koncentrat</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="priklopnik"><i>priklopnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zaviralec"><i>zaviral</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zbirnik"><i>zbirnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="izotop"><i>izotop</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="poraženec"><i>poražen</i><par n="kos/ec__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="buzarant"><i>buzarant</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ščitnik"><i>ščitnik</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="daljnogled"><i>daljnogled</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vrzel"><i>vrzel</i><par n="vez__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kvadrat"><i>kvadrat</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uspešnost"><i>uspe</i><par n="uspe/šnost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="predavatelj"><i>predavatelj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lakaj"><i>lakaj</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="odklon"><i>odklon</i><par n="roj__n_m"/></e>
